Hawaii statutes.
PART XI.
STOPPING, STANDING AND PARKING

§291C-111 Noncompliance with stopping,
standing, or parking requirements. (a) With respect to highways under
their respective jurisdictions, the director of transportation is authorized to
and the counties by ordinance may prohibit or restrict the stopping, standing,
or parking of vehicles where the stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous to
those using the highway or where the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles
would interfere unduly with the free movement of traffic; provided that the
violation of any law or any ordinance, regardless of whether established under
this or any other section, prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing,
or parking of vehicles shall constitute a traffic infraction. The counties
shall not provide any other penalty, civil or criminal, or any other charge, in
the form of rental or otherwise, in place of or in addition to the fine to be
imposed by the district court for any violation of any ordinance prohibiting or
restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles.

This section shall not be construed as
prohibiting the authority of the director of transportation or the counties to
allow the stopping, standing, or parking of motor vehicles at a
"T-shaped" intersection on highways under their respective
jurisdictions; provided that such stopping, standing, or parking of motor
vehicles is not dangerous to those using the highway or where the stopping,
standing, or parking of motor vehicles would not unduly interfere with the free
movement of traffic.

The appropriate police department and county or
prosecuting attorney of the various counties shall enforce any law or ordinance
prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles,
including but not limited to the issuance of parking tickets. Any person
committing a violation of any law or ordinance, regardless of whether
established under this or any other section, prohibiting or restricting the
stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles shall be subject to a fine to be
enforced and collected by the district courts of this State and to be deposited
into the state general fund for state use.

(b) The
director of transportation, the counties, and owners of private highways, with
the consent of the county official responsible for traffic control with respect
to highways under their respective jurisdictions shall place signs or curb
markings which are clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person
prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on
the highway. Such signs or curb markings shall be official signs and markings
and no person shall stop, stand, or park any vehicle in violation of the
restrictions stated on such signs or markings. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1;
am L 1974, c 133, §4; am L 1976, c 238, §1; am L 1993, c 214, §12; am L 1994, c
273, §1; am L 1995, c 173, §5; am L 1999, c 44, §1]

Cross References

Adjudication of traffic infractions, see chapter 291D.

Parking violation exemption, see §621-8.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next